el: Υλικό φύλλου ελατηρίου: Σύνθετο υλικό (fiberglass); Ατσάλι; Άλλο
ja: リーフスプリング素材: コンポジット (グラスファイバー); スチール; その他
zh-TW: 葉片彈簧材質: 複合材質 (玻璃纖維); 鋼; 其他
sv: Bladfjäderns material: Komposit (glasfiber); Stål; Övrigt
pt-BR: Material da mola de lâminas: Composto (fibra de vidro); Aço; Outro
lt-LT: Lakštinių lingių medžiaga: Kompozitas (stiklo pluoštas); Plienas; Kita
hr-HR: Materijal lisnate opruge: Kompozit (stakloplastika); Čelik; Ostalo
it: Materiale della molla a balestra: Composito (fibra di vetro); Acciaio; Altro
ro-RO: Material pentru arc lamelar: Compozit (fibră de sticlă); Oțel; Altele
tr: Yaprak yay malzemesi: Kompozit (fiberglas); Çelik; Diğer
pt-PT: Material das molas de lâmina: Compósito (fibra de vidro); Aço; Outro
nb: Materiale i bladfjær: Kompositt (glassfiber); Stål; Annet
fr: Matériau des ressorts à lames: Composite (fibre de verre); Acier; Autre
zh-CN: 叶片弹簧材质: 复合材料（玻璃纤维）; 钢; 其他
pl: Materiał resoru: Kompozyt (włókno szklane); Stal; Inne
ko: 리프 스프링 소재: 복합재(유리 섬유); 강철; 기타
cs: Materiál listových pružin: Kompozit (sklolaminát); Ocel; Jiné
de: Biegefedermaterial: Verbundstoff (Glasfaser); Stahl; Sonstige
fi: Lehtijousen materiaali: Komposiitti (lasikuitu); Teräs; Muu
vi: Chất liệu của nhíp xe: Composite (sợi thủy tinh); Thép; Khác
hu: Laprugó anyaga: Kompozit (üvegszálas); Acél; Egyéb
da: Bladfjedermateriale: Komposit (glasfiber); Stål; Andet
sl-SI: Material listnate vzmeti: Kompozit (steklena vlakna); Jeklo; Drugo
sk-SK: Materiál listovej pružiny: Kompozit (sklolaminát); Oceľ; Iné
ru: Материал листовой пружины: Композит (стекловолокно); Сталь; Другое
th: วัสดุที่ใช้ทำแหนบสปริง: คอมโพสิต (ไฟเบอร์กลาส); เหล็ก; อื่นๆ
en: Leaf spring material: Composite (fiberglass); Steel; Other
es: Material del resorte de lámina: Compuesto (fibra de vidrio); Acero; Otro
bg-BG: Материал на листовата пружина: Композитен материал (фибростъкло); Стомана; Друг
nl: Bladveermateriaal: Composiet (glasvezel); Staal; Overig